Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.050

Qualifications of judges.

A judge of the court shall be:

(1) Admitted to the practice of law in the courts of this state not less than five years prior to taking office.

(2) A resident for not less than one year at the time of appointment or initial election in the district for which his or her position was created.

[ 2011 c 336 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 5.]